Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 9.5
TRANSIT CONSTRUCTION AUTHORITY

32-9.5-101 to 32-9.5-110. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article repealed, p. 1321, § 2, effective August 1.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1987. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1989, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For the holding that the transit construction authority (prior to its repeal in 1989) was not a service authority within the meaning of § 17 of article XIV of the Colorado constitution, see Anema v. Transit Const. Authority, 788 P.2d 1261 (Colo. 1990).